New Jersey, session 222, A4828.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2007, c.53 (C.18A:55-3) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As a condition of receiving State aid, a school district shall: a.     examine all available group options for every insurance policy held by the district, including any self-insurance plan administered by the New Jersey School Boards Association Insurance Group on behalf of districts, and shall participate in the most cost effective plans; b.    take steps to maximize the district's participation in the federal Universal Service Program (E-rate) and the ACT telecommunications program offered through the New Jersey Association of School Business Officials; c.     participate in the Alliance for Competitive Energy Services (ACES) Program offered through the New Jersey School Boards Association, unless the district is able to demonstrate to the commissioner that it receives goods or services at a cost less than or equal to the cost achieved by participants in the program; d.    take appropriate steps to maximize the district's participation in the Special Education Medicaid Initiative (SEMI) Program, with maximum participation defined by the commissioner; and e.     refinance all outstanding debt for which a [3%] two percent net present value savings threshold is achievable. (cf: P.L.2007, c.53, s.1) 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Education may take any administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.